Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Costs and Attorney Fees.

Sec. 09.60.010.
Costs and attorney fees allowed prevailing party.

The supreme court shall determine by rule or order the costs, if any, that may be allowed a prevailing party in a civil action. Unless specifically authorized by statute or by agreement between the parties, attorney fees may not be awarded to a party in a civil action for personal injury, death, or property damage related to or arising out of fault, as defined in AS

09.17.900

, unless the civil action is contested without trial, or fully contested as determined by the court.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, a court in this state may not discriminate in the award of attorney fees and costs to or against a party in a civil action or appeal based on the nature of the policy or interest advocated by the party, the number of persons affected by the outcome of the case, whether a governmental entity could be expected to bring or participate in the case, the extent of the party’s economic incentive to bring the case, or any combination of these factors.

In a civil action or appeal concerning the establishment, protection, or enforcement of a right under the United States Constitution or the Constitution of the State of Alaska, the court

shall award, subject to (d) and (e) of this section, full reasonable attorney fees and costs to a claimant, who, as plaintiff, counterclaimant, cross claimant, or third-party plaintiff in the action or on appeal, has prevailed in asserting the right;

may not order a claimant to pay the attorney fees of the opposing party devoted to claims concerning constitutional rights if the claimant as plaintiff, counterclaimant, cross claimant, or third-party plaintiff in the action or appeal did not prevail in asserting the right, the action or appeal asserting the right was not frivolous, and the claimant did not have sufficient economic incentive to bring the action or appeal regardless of the constitutional claims involved.

In calculating an award of attorney fees and costs under (c)(1) of this section,

the court shall include in the award only that portion of the services of claimant’s attorney fees and associated costs that were devoted to claims concerning rights under the United States Constitution or the Constitution of the State of Alaska upon which the claimant ultimately prevailed; and

the court shall make an award only if the claimant did not have sufficient economic incentive to bring the suit, regardless of the constitutional claims involved.

The court, in its discretion, may abate, in full or in part, an award of attorney fees and costs otherwise payable under (c) and (d) of this section if the court finds, based upon sworn affidavits or testimony, that the full imposition of the award would inflict a substantial and undue hardship upon the party ordered to pay the fees and costs or, if the party is a public entity, upon the taxpaying constituents of the public entity.

History.

(§ 5.14 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 139 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For related court rules, see Civ.
R. 54, 79, and 82. For effect of the 1986 amendment to this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 82, see § 8, ch. 139, SLA 1986, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative purpose relating to the provisions of ch. 86, SLA 2003, that add subsections (b) — (e) to this section, see § 1, ch. 86, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 139, SLA 1986 provides that the 1986 amendment to this section applies “to all causes of action accruing after June 11, 1986.”

Section 4, ch. 86, SLA 2003 provides that the provisions of ch. 86, SLA 2003 adding subsections (b) — (e) to this section apply “to all civil actions and appeals filed on or after September 11, 2003.”

Sec. 09.60.015.
Attorney fees in certain small claims actions.

In any action for damages where the amount pleaded is $1,000 or less, and the plaintiff, when represented by counsel, prevails in the action, the plaintiff shall be allowed a reasonable amount to be fixed by the court as attorney fees for the prosecution of the action as a part of the costs of the action if the court finds that written demand for the payment of the claim was made on the defendant 20 days or more before the commencement of the action. However, attorney fees may not be allowed to the plaintiff if the court finds that the defendant tendered to the plaintiff before the commencement of the action, an amount not less than the damages awarded to the plaintiff.

If the defendant, when represented by counsel, pleads a counterclaim that does not exceed $1,000, and the defendant prevails in the action, the defendant shall be allowed a reasonable amount to be fixed by the court as attorney fees for the prosecution of the counterclaim as part of the costs of the action.

This section is subject to AS

45.50.537

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “attorney fees may not” was substituted for “no attorney fees shall” in (a) of this section to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.60.020.
Liability of guardian ad litem for costs.

A person appointed guardian ad litem by a court for an infant or incompetent defendant is not liable for the costs of the action.

History.

(§ 5.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A” was substituted for “No” and “is not liable” was substituted for “is liable” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Quoted

in

M.M. v. State, 462 P.3d 539 (Alaska 2020).

Sec. 09.60.030.
Guardian’s responsibility for allowance against infant plaintiff.

When costs or disbursements are adjudged against an infant plaintiff or incompetent, the guardian by whom the plaintiff appeared in the action is responsible for the payment, and payment may be enforced against the guardian as if the guardian were the actual plaintiff.

History.

(§ 5.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.60.040.
Costs where party is a representative.

In actions in which an executor, administrator, trustee of an express trust, or a person authorized to represent a party is a party, costs may be allowed as in other cases.
However, when costs are allowed against that party, they are chargeable solely upon the estate, fund, or party represented unless the court orders the costs to be paid by that party personally for mismanagement or bad faith in the conduct of the action.

History.

(§ 5.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.60.050.
Costs awarded against state, borough, city, or other public agencies.

When the state or a borough, city, or other public agency or entity or an officer thereof in an official capacity is a party, costs shall be awarded against it on the same basis as against any other natural person or party. However, when the action is brought upon the information of a natural person, that person shall be liable for costs awarded against the state.
The costs may not be recovered from the state until after execution has issued for the costs against that person and has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part.

History.

(§ 5.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.60.060.
Security for costs where plaintiff a nonresident or foreign corporation.

When the plaintiff in an action resides out of the state or is a foreign corporation, security for the costs and attorney fees, which may be awarded against the plaintiff, may be required by the defendant, if timely demand is made within 30 days after the defendant discovers that the plaintiff is a nonresident.
When required, all proceedings in the action shall be stayed until an undertaking executed by one or more sufficient sureties is filed with the court to the effect that they will pay the costs and attorney fees which are awarded against the plaintiff, for not less than $200.
A new or an additional undertaking may be ordered by the court upon proof that the original undertaking is insufficient in amount or security.

History.

(§ 5.12 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1971)

Sec. 09.60.070.
Attorney fees for victims of serious criminal offenses.

A person who has been injured or damaged, or the estate of a person who has died, may recover from the offender full reasonable attorney fees in a civil action or a wrongful death action if the injury, damage, or death resulted from

an attempt on the part of the person to prevent the commission of a serious criminal offense or to apprehend an offender who has committed a serious criminal offense, or aiding or attempting to aid a police officer to do so, or aiding a victim of a serious criminal offense; or

the commission or attempt on the part of the offender to commit a serious criminal offense.

If a judgment for attorney fees is entered against an offender in a civil action brought under this section, and a contract of insurance requires an insurer to pay the attorney fees, the insurer shall be liable only for the attorney fees that would be awarded to the plaintiff under Rule 82(b)(1), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

In this section, “serious criminal offense” means the following offenses:

murder in any degree;

manslaughter;

criminally negligent homicide;

assault in any degree;

kidnapping;

sexual assault in any degree;

sexual abuse of a minor in any degree;

robbery in any degree;

coercion;

extortion;

arson in any degree;

burglary in any degree;

criminal mischief in the first, second, third, or fourth degree;

driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance or another crime resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, boat, or airplane when the offender is under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance;

a crime involving domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.55.601

. Renumbered in 1994. In 1994, in subsection (b) “Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82(b)(1)” was substituted for “Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82(a)(1)” to reflect the 1993 restructuring of the court rule.

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see § 25, ch. 57, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “Rule 82(b)(1), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure” for “Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82(b)(1)” in (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 24, ch. 57, SLA 1991 provides that this section “applies to an action arising from a crime committed or attempted on or after September 15, 1991.”

Section 21, ch. 92, SLA 2002 provides that the 2002 amendment to (c)(13) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 28, 2002.”

Sec. 09.60.080.
Contingent fee agreements.

If an attorney contracts for or collects a contingency fee in connection with an action for personal injury, death, or property damage, and the damages awarded by a court or jury include an award of punitive damages, the contingent fee due the attorney shall be calculated before that portion of punitive damages due the state under AS

09.17.020(j)

has been deducted from the total award of damages.

History.

(§ 28 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”